Utah, session 2026, SB328.
Section 1. Section 17B-2a-1112 is amended to read:17B-2a-1112. Audit -- Transparency in certain municipal services.(1)The board of trustees shall provide a copy of an accounting report, as defined in Section 51-2a-102, to each political subdivision that is provided municipal services by the municipal services district that is filed with the state auditor on behalf of the municipal services district in accordance with Section 51-2a-203.(2)When the district provides a municipal services to a municipality within the district's service area in regard to a proposal for planning or zoning, the district shall:(a)provide notice on the district's website that the district is engaged in a planning or zoning project for the municipality;(b)analyze the potential impact of a proposed planning or zoning action on property values within the municipality that may adopt the proposal;(c)provide the district's analysis described in Subsection (2)(b) with the proposal to the municipality;(d)consult with an independent third party to assess potential unintended consequences of a proposed planning or zoning action on residents and property owners within a municipality;(e)identify properties, if any, that would be adversely affected by a proposed planning or zoning action, including by address, parcel number, general description of type of property, or another method that reasonably informs the municipality considering the proposal; and(f)provide any results of the consultation described in Subsection (2)(d) with the proposal to the municipality.(3)A municipal services district shall ensure that at least one board member or one district employee is available to answer questions and present information in any public meeting of a municipality in which a municipal legislative body considers a recommendation or proposal regarding planning or zoning that is prepared by the municipal services district.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.